Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Chapter 9. State Aid Roads in Counties
§ 65-9-29.
Allocation and matching of certain federal road construction funds.

Federal aid secondary funds allocated to Mississippi and to be expended on the federal aid secondary system roads shall be expended as follows:

Effective only upon the passage of an act of the Legislature providing state aid funds, federal aid secondary funds allocated to Mississippi and to be expended on the federal aid secondary system shall be divided between the Mississippi Department of Transportation and the several counties, so that fifty percent (50%) will be matched by the Mississippi Department of Transportation and expended on the federal aid secondary system roads on the state highway system, and fifty percent (50%) matched by the counties with state aid funds and expended on the federal aid secondary roads of the state aid road system.

Such division will be made upon allocation by the Administrator of the Federal Highway Administration after the Department of Transportation provides for the matching of the percent of such allotment as covered by federal act and available for financing in part the Mississippi Department of Transportation’s Division of Highway Planning. The expenditure of all federal aid secondary funds shall be through and under the Department of Transportation, subject to and in accordance with all rules and regulations and applicable laws of the federal government.

The amount of funds allocated to each county for use on State Aid System roads shall be apportioned among the counties of this state by the Mississippi Transportation Commission subject to and in accordance with applicable federal law, rules and regulations, and limited to such counties as recommended by the State Aid Engineer. The Mississippi Transportation Commission is authorized to finance from its own funds the preliminary surveys, engineering and plans for all work involving funds expended on federal aid secondary projects on the state aid road system, and the rights-of-way required for state aid system roads constructed with federal aid secondary funds shall be provided by the county receiving such aid from its funds other than state aid funds. The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall program federal aid secondary funds made available to the counties under this act on such projects and limited to such counties as recommended by the State Aid Engineer.

Federal “safer off-system” funds, and/or any other available federal road funds, except the federal aid secondary funds hereinabove provided for separately, allocated to Mississippi and to be expended on county roads, but not on the designated state highway system, shall be expended as follows:

Federal “safer off-system” funds and/or any such other available federal road funds shall be matched with available state aid funds and expended on such county roads.

The expenditure of such federal “safer off-system” funds and all such other available federal road funds shall be through and under the Mississippi Department of Transportation, subject to, and in accordance with, all rules and regulations and applicable laws of the federal government.

The amount of such federal “safer off-system” funds and/or all such other available federal road funds allocated to each county for use on such county roads shall be apportioned among the counties of this state by the Mississippi Transportation Commission in accordance with the formula in the manner provided in Section 65-9-3, Mississippi Code of 1972. The Mississippi Transportation Commission will program such federal “safer off-system” funds and all such other available federal road funds made available to the counties on such projects and limited to such counties as recommended by the State Aid Engineer.

Federal aid off-system highway funds allocated to Mississippi, (except federal aid secondary funds and federal “safer off-system” funds provided for separately in subsections (1) and (2) of this section), including federal bridge replacement funds and other special grants made available for expenditure of county roads, shall be expended as follows:

Federal aid off-system highway funds expended on state aid roads shall be matched with available state aid funds and/or other available local funds, or as otherwise provided in Section 65-1-70, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Federal aid off-system highway funds available for expenditure on roads not on the state aid system and not eligible for inclusion on the state aid system shall be matched with available local funds, or as otherwise provided in Section 65-9-17 or Section 65-1-70, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The expenditure of all federal off-system highway funds on county roads shall be programmed by the Mississippi Transportation Commission, subject to and in accordance with applicable federal law, rules and regulations, and limited to such county projects as recommended by the State Aid Engineer. The State Aid Engineer is authorized to assign state aid personnel to administer off-system construction projects and other special federal aid program requirements in the same manner and under the same provisions and conditions as other projects authorized under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8035-10; Laws, 1949, Ex. Sess. ch. 6 § 9(¶¶ 5 and 6); Laws, 1952, ch. 286, § 2(¶¶ 5-7); Laws, 1955, Ex. Sess. ch. 67 (¶¶ 5-7); Laws, 1958, chs. 367, § 3(¶¶ 5-7), 368; Laws, 1962, ch. 449, § 1(¶¶ 6-8); Laws, 1963, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 20, § 1(¶¶ 6-8); Laws, 1974, ch. 481, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 516, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 414, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 374, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-9-30.
Accounts and utilization of funds.

The State Aid Engineer shall maintain an accurate record of all federal aid secondary funds, federal “safer off-system” funds, and all other available federal road funds allocated to the counties in accordance with the percentages set out in Section 65-9-3. He shall likewise maintain an accurate account of all state aid funds apportioned to the counties in accordance with the percentages and provisions set out in Section 27-65-75.

The State Aid Engineer is hereby authorized to utilize state aid funds, and federal aid secondary funds allocated to the counties as provided for in accordance with Section 65-9-29, and federal “safer off-system” funds, and/or any other available federal road funds allocated to Mississippi and to be expended on county roads, and allocated to the counties as provided for in accordance with Section 65-9-29, in such amounts as he deems necessary for an orderly and effective programming of all funds available to the counties, including an interchange of one (1) type of funds for another type of funds when necessary; provided, however, that each county shall receive, not less than annually, its pro rata share of the combined funds so allocated; and further provided that the authority of the county boards of supervisors to otherwise adopt construction programs is in no way circumvented.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 481, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 516, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1978).

§ 65-9-31.
Qualifications of contractors.

All work done under the provisions of Sections 19-9-51 through 19-9-77, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be done by contractors who qualify under the provisions of Sections 31-3-1 through 31-3-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, except with the consent of the State Aid Road Engineer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2926-65; Laws, 1962, ch. 255, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 65-9-33.
Authorization to administer certain bridge replacement project in Lowndes County.

In addition to any authority granted to the Division of State Aid Road Construction in Chapter 9, Title 65, Mississippi Code of 1972, and notwithstanding any general prohibition contained therein with respect to the administration by the division of certain federal funds on designated state highways, the division is authorized and empowered to administer a project utilizing available federal funds to reconstruct that portion of designated Mississippi Highway 182 in Lowndes County, Mississippi, that spans the Tombigbee River on Federal Aid Urban Route Number 9539, jurisdiction for the maintenance of which is, on March 12, 1990, vested in Lowndes County pursuant to an agreement executed by the county, the State Highway Commission and the City of Columbus.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 324, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1990).

§ 65-9-35.
Utilization of available federal and state funds to reconstruct certain portions of Mississippi Highway 407 in Attala County, Mississippi, authorized.

In addition to any authority granted to the Division of State Aid Road Construction in Chapter 9, Title 65, Mississippi Code of 1972, and notwithstanding any general prohibition contained therein with respect to the administration by the division of certain federal funds on designated state highways, the division is authorized and empowered to administer a project utilizing available federal and state funds to reconstruct that portion of designated Mississippi Highway 407 in Attala County, Mississippi, that spans Tibby Creek in Section 25, Township 16 North, Range 9 East, jurisdiction for the maintenance of which is, on April 17, 2017, vested in Attala County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 430, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 17, 2017).